Utah statutes.
62A-11-102.   Office of Recovery Services -- Creation.

(1)  There is created within the department the Office of Recovery Services which has the powers and duties provided by law.

(2)  The office is under the administrative and general supervision of the executive director.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1988 General Session

